Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2259.02
State Probation
Contractual Services Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The
State Probation Contractual Services Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
consist only of payments received by the state pursuant to contractual agreements
with local political subdivisions for probation services provided by the Office
of Probation Administration. Except as otherwise directed by the Supreme Court
during the period from November 21, 2009, until June 30, 2013, the
fund shall only be used to pay for probation services provided by the Office
of Probation Administration to local political subdivisions which enter into
contractual agreements with the Office of Probation Administration. The fund
shall be administered by the probation administrator. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 29;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 19.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.